Nebraska, session 109, LB366.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 11 of this act:
(1) Agency has the same meaning as in section 84-901;
(2) Major rule or regulation means any rule or regulation of any
kind, including an emergency rule or regulation, that will result in or
is likely to result in:
(a) An economic impact of one million dollars or more over a five-
year period; or
(b) Significant adverse effects on competition, employment,
investment, productivity, or innovation, including significant adverse
effects on individual industries or regions;
(3) Nonmajor rule or regulation means any rule or regulation that is
not a major rule or regulation; and
(4) Rule or regulation has the same meaning as in section 84-901.
Sec. 2. (1) The Legislative Economic Analysis Unit is created
within the Legislature to provide independent and reliable economic
analysis and other information relevant to the conduct of the
Legislature's oversight and legislative duties.
(2) The Chief Economist shall be the director of the unit and shall
be appointed by the Speaker of the Legislature and shall serve at the
pleasure of the Speaker.
(3) The Chief Economist shall employ such other career professionals
as deemed necessary and appropriate, subject to the appropriations
provided by the Legislature. In determining the annual appropriation, the
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall use as a baseline a
one-percent to two-percent contribution from the budget of each agency so
that agencies are properly incorporating the cost of an independent
analysis and legislative review of their rules and regulations.
Sec. 3. The Legislative Economic Analysis Unit shall:
(1) Determine whether a rule or regulation or proposed rule or
regulation that is required to be submitted to the Legislature under
sections 1 to 11 of this act is a major rule or regulation if such
-2-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
determination is requested by the Speaker of the Legislature or the
chairperson of any standing committee that has jurisdiction over the
subject matter of the rule or regulation;
(2) Provide a regulatory impact analysis as specified in section 5
of this act for any major rule or regulation or any proposed major rule
or regulation within fifteen legislative days after submission by an
agency as a major rule or regulation or within fifteen legislative days
after the unit's determination that any other rule or regulation is a
major rule or regulation;
(3) Provide a regulatory impact analysis for any existing rules and
regulations as specified in section 6 of this act; and
(4) Provide an impact analysis of significant grants received from
the federal government or from other sources external to state
government, when requested by the Speaker of the Legislature or the
chairperson of any standing committee that has jurisdiction over the
subject matter of the grant.
Sec. 4. The Legislative Economic Analysis Unit shall provide notice
that a determination has been made that a rule or regulation or proposed
rule or regulation submitted to the Legislature is a major rule or
regulation and that such rule or regulation might not be in effect
without a sixty-day legislative consideration or approval. The district
court shall have jurisdiction to conduct de novo review of whether a rule
or regulation is a major rule or regulation and the affect that has on
its effective date if not approved by the Legislature, but no such
determination precludes the Legislature from acting to approve,
disapprove, or enact other legislation regarding a rule or regulation at
any time.
Sec. 5. Whenever reasonably practicable, the Legislative Economic
Analysis Unit shall include any or all of the following in a regulatory
impact analysis or an impact analysis of a grant under section 3 of this
act:
-3-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
(1) Statement of need;
(2) Legal basis for the rule, regulation, or grant;
(3) Examination of alternatives for any new rule, regulation, or
grant;
(4) Evaluation of costs and benefits for each alternative for any
new rule, regulation, or grant, including:
(a) Estimated primary or direct benefits;
(b) Estimated cost savings or financial benefits to society;
(c) Estimated compliance costs for regulated entities;
(d) Estimated secondary or indirect costs;
(e) Estimated effect on state revenue;
(f) Estimated effect on state expenditures, including estimated
administrative expenses; and
(g) Estimated opportunity cost. The analysis shall identify the
opportunity cost of compliance as a result of the removal of private
capital from the market;
(5) Sources consulted; and
(6) Key assumptions and sources of uncertainty.
Sec. 6. The Legislative Economic Analysis Unit shall, to the extent
resources are available, evaluate or conduct the analysis specified in
section 5 of this act for specified existing rules and regulations and
nonmajor rules and regulations when requested by a chairperson of a
standing committee relating to matters within the committee's
jurisdiction. The unit shall undertake such a review in the order
requested unless, in a given legislative session, the Speaker of the
Legislature directs otherwise.
Sec. 7. The Legislative Economic Analysis Unit shall, upon
completion, make the analysis of each rule, regulation, or grant publicly
available. At the end of each calendar year, the Chief Economist shall
provide the Speaker of the Legislature with an electronic report
summarizing the matters evaluated that year.
-4-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
Sec. 8. (1) Within one month after the effective date of a
legislative bill, the Legislature shall specify an email address or other
electronic means for the delivery of rules or regulations and other
information pursuant to sections 1 to 11 of this act, including during
times when the Legislature is not in session.
(2) In addition, before any agency may file a rule or regulation
with the Secretary of State for publication, the agency promulgating a
covered rule or regulation shall publish in a newspaper having general
circulation in the state and shall electronically submit to the
Legislature and to the Chief Economist a report containing:
(a) A copy of the rule or regulation;
(b) A concise general statement relating to the rule or regulation;
(c) A classification of the rule or regulation as a major or
nonmajor rule or regulation, including an explanation of why it
presumptively is or is not a major rule or regulation;
(d) A list of any other related regulatory actions intended to
implement the same statutory provision or regulatory objective as well as
the individual and aggregate economic effects of those actions; and
(e) The proposed effective date of the rule or regulation.
(3) On the date of the submission of the report, the agency
promulgating the rule or regulation shall submit to the Chief Economist
and make available to the Legislature:
(a) A complete copy of the cost-benefit analysis of the rule or
regulation, if any, including an analysis of any jobs added or lost,
differentiating between public and private sector jobs; and
(b) Any other relevant information or requirements under any other
statute and any relevant executive orders.
Sec. 9. The Legislative Economic Analysis Unit shall provide a
report on each major rule or regulation to the committee with subject
matter jurisdiction by the end of the fifteenth legislative day after its
submission or publication date, whichever is later. The report shall
-5-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
include an assessment of the agency's compliance with procedural steps
required by subsection (3) of section 8 of this act, an assessment of
whether the major rule or regulation imposes any new limits or mandates
on private-sector activity, and its regulatory impact analysis. Each
agency shall cooperate with the unit by providing information relevant to
the report under this section.
Sec. 10. (1) Subject to the exceptions in this section, a major
rule or regulation shall not be submitted to the Secretary of State for
publication before the Legislature enacts a law ratifying the rule or
regulation or the expiration of sixty legislative days after submission
to the Legislature without a final vote on the rule or regulation. A
major rule or regulation may go into effect later than sixty legislative
days after submission to the Legislature if so specified in the proposed
rule or regulation and such rule or regulation was not disapproved by the
Legislature before its specified effective date.
(2) If the Governor believes a major rule or regulation should go
into effect before the passage of sixty legislative days, including when
the Legislature is not in session or near the end of a legislative
session, it is the intent of the Legislature that it should extend the
legislative session or the Governor should call the Legislature into
special session for the sole purpose of voting to approve or disapprove
the proposed major rule or regulation. In such cases, the Legislature
shall work in good faith to schedule the vote promptly as the situation
requires, and such debate and vote on the proposed major rule or
regulation shall be by such means as are specified in the Rules of the
Nebraska Unicameral Legislature, or in the absence of such rules, as
specified by the presiding officer of the Legislature.
Sec. 11. (1) The legislative procedure leading to and including a
final vote on a legislative bill under sections 1 to 11 of this act shall
not be subject to judicial review, but courts may give effect to
legislative bills enacted pursuant to sections 1 to 11 of this act.
-6-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a court may
determine whether an agency or the Legislature has completed the
necessary requirements under sections 1 to 11 of this act for a rule or
regulation to take effect, including de novo review of whether a rule or
regulation is a major rule or regulation that requires delayed
legislative consideration or approval by the Legislature before it takes
effect.
(3) The enactment of legislation under section 10 of this act shall
not be interpreted to serve as a grant or modification of statutory
authority by the Legislature for the adoption and promulgation of a rule
or regulation, shall not extinguish or affect any claim, whether
substantive or procedural, against any alleged defect in a rule or
regulation, and shall not form part of the record before the court in any
judicial proceeding concerning a rule or regulation except for purposes
of determining whether or not the rule or regulation is in effect.
Sec. 12. Section 84-901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-901 For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act:
(1) Agency shall mean each board, commission, department, officer,
division, or other administrative office or unit of the state government
authorized by law to make rules and regulations, except the Adjutant
General's office as provided in Chapter 55, the courts including the
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, the Commission of Industrial
Relations, the Legislature, and the Secretary of State with respect to
the duties imposed by the act;
(2) Rule or regulation shall mean any standard of general
application adopted by an agency in accordance with the authority
conferred by statute and includes, but is not limited to, the amendment
or repeal of a rule or regulation. Rule or regulation shall not include
(a) internal procedural documents which provide guidance to staff on
agency organization and operations, lacking the force of law, and not
-7-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
relied upon to bind the public, (b) guidance documents as issued by an
agency in accordance with section 84-901.03, and (c) forms and
instructions developed by an agency. For purposes of the act, every
standard which prescribes a penalty shall be presumed to have general
applicability and any standard affecting private rights, private
interests, or procedures available to the public is presumed to be relied
upon to bind the public. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to
require an agency to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations when
statute authorizes but does not require it;
(3) Contested case shall mean a proceeding before an agency in which
the legal rights, duties, or privileges of specific parties are required
by law or constitutional right to be determined after an agency hearing;
(4) Ex parte communication shall mean an oral or written
communication which is not on the record in a contested case with respect
to which reasonable notice to all parties was not given. Filing and
notice of filing provided under subdivision (6)(d) of section 84-914
shall not be considered on the record and reasonable notice for purposes
of this subdivision. Ex parte communication shall not include:
(a) Communications which do not pertain to the merits of a contested
case;
(b) Communications required for the disposition of ex parte matters
as authorized by law;
(c) Communications in a ratemaking or rulemaking proceeding; and
(d) Communications to which all parties have given consent;
(5) Guidance document shall mean any statement developed by an
agency which lacks the force of law but provides information or direction
of general application to the public to interpret or implement statutes
or such agency’s rules or regulations. A guidance document is binding on
an agency until amended by the agency. A guidance document shall not give
rise to any legal right or duty or be treated as authority for any
standard, requirement, or policy. Internal procedural documents which
-8-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
provide guidance to staff on agency organization and operations shall not
be considered guidance documents; and
(6) Hearing officer shall mean the person or persons conducting a
hearing, contested case, or other proceeding pursuant to the act, whether
designated as the presiding officer, administrative law judge, or some
other title designation; and .
(7) Major rule or regulation has the same meaning as in section 1 of
this act.
Sec. 13. Section 84-901.04, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-901.04 (1) If an agency determines that the adoption, amendment,
or repeal of a rule or regulation is necessitated by an emergency
situation, the agency may adopt, amend, or repeal a rule or regulation
upon approval of the Governor. Such agency’s request shall be submitted
to the Governor in writing and include a justification as to why the
emergency rule or regulation is necessary. Factors for the justification
shall include:
(a) Imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare; or
(b) The unforeseen loss of federal funding for an agency program.
(2) The Governor may approve the adoption of a major rule or
regulation under subsection (1) of this section only by publishing a
statement with the rule or regulation:
(a) Explaining why an emergency exists that requires an earlier
effective date for the rule or regulation or why a federal requirement or
federal funding requires an earlier effective date;
(b) If the Legislature is not in session, explaining why the
Legislature cannot be called back into session specially to consider and
vote on the major rule or regulation; and
(c) Explaining why the issuance of the major rule or regulation
otherwise complies with emergency powers statutes and limitations or is
required by federal law or for federal funding.
-9-

LB366 LB366
2025 2025
(3) (2) Any agency may use the emergency rule or regulation
procedure as provided in this section. However, no agency shall use such
procedure to avoid the consequences for failing to timely adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations.
(4) (3) Rules and regulations adopted, amended, or repealed under
this section shall be exempted from the notice and hearings requirements
of section 84-907 and the review process required under section 84-905.01
and shall be valid upon approval of the Governor. An emergency rule or
regulation shall remain in effect for a period of ninety calendar days
and is renewable once for a period not to exceed ninety calendar days.
(5) (4) Any agency which adopts, amends, or repeals a rule or
regulation under this section shall file such rule or regulation with the
Secretary of State. The agency shall also publish such rule or regulation
on the agency's website.
Sec. 14. Original sections 84-901 and 84-901.04, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-10-